fts/tsearch_data/russian.dict
банкротиться/LW
бередить/BLPW
благодарить/BLPW
бодриться/BLPW
бредить/LPW
буравить/LPTW
ваксить/LPW
ввалиться/BLRW
вдарить/LRTW
веселиться/BLPW
взбодрить/BLRW
взвалить/BLRW
взгромоздиться/BLRW
взмылиться/LRW
взъяриться/LRW
вклеить/LRTW
влачить/BLPW
вменить/BLRW
внушить/BLRW
возбудить/BLRW
возвысить/LRTW
возложить/BLRW
возносить/BLPW
возродиться/BLRW
вооружить/BLRW
воротиться/BLRW
восполнить/BLRW
восстановить/BLRW
вперить/LRTW
врубить/BLRW
вскормить/BLRW
вспушить/BLRW
вступить/BLRW
втравить/BLRW
выбросить/BLRTW
выводить/BLPW
выгрузить/BLRW
выдолбить/BLRW
выкатить/BLRW
выкормиться/BLRW
выкурить/BLRW
выложиться/BLRW
выместиться/LW
выносить/BLPW
выплатить/BLRW
выпустить/BLRW
выразиться/BLRW
вырядиться/BLRW
высвободиться/BLRW
выслужить/BLRW
выстудить/BLRW
вытворить/LRW
вытурить/BLRW
выходить/BLPRW
вычислить/BLRW
выяснить/BLRW
глупить/BLPW
гомонить/BLPW
горюниться/LPTW
графить/LW
громоздиться/BLPW
гусарить/LPW
делиться/BLPW
добудиться/LRW
договорить/BLRW
дозвониться/BLRW
докурить/BLRW
домучить/LRW
допросить/BLRW
доставить/LRTW
доходить/BLPRW
дрейфить/LTW
дурачить/LPTW
ежить/LPTW
ёжиться/LPTW
жениться/BLPRW
заарканить/LRTW
заблудиться/BLRW
забродить/LRW
завершить/BLRW
заворожить/BLRW
заглубить/LRW
загорланить/LRW
загромоздить/LRW
задавиться/LW
задушить/BLRW
зажилить/LRTW
закадрить/LRW
заключить/BLRW
закормить/LRW
закружить/BLRW
закусить/BLRW
заложить/BLRW
замаячить/LRW
заместить/BLRW
замусорить/LRW
занизить/LRW
запечалиться/LRW
запомнить/BLRW
запропаститься/LRW
запылить/BLRW
зарумяниться/LRW
засекретиться/LRW
заслонить/BLRW
заспорить/LRTW
застроить/LRW
засуетиться/BLRW
затворить/BLRW
затопиться/LRW
затрезвонить/LRW
затушить/BLRW
зацепить/BLRW
зачинить/BLRW
зашторить/LRTW
заявиться/BLRW
знакомиться/LPTW
избороздить/LRW
изволить/LRTW
изжарить/LRTW
изложить/BLRW
измолотить/LRW
изничтожить/LRTW
израниться/LRW
изъездить/LRW
исключить/BLRW
искупить/BLRW
испоганить/LRTW
исправиться/LRTW
истощиться/LRW
итожить/LPTW
калить/LPW
кашеварить/LPW
клонить/BLPW
контачить/LW
коптить/BLPW
коробить/LPW
кочевряжиться/LPTW
крестить/BLPW
крошить/BLPW
купить/BLRW
лазить/LPTW
лечиться/BLPW
ломить/BLPW
лучить/LPW
материть/LPW
мерить/LPTW
множиться/LPTW
морить/BLPW
мостить/LW
мусолиться/LPW
мягчить/LPW
навалиться/BLRW
наворожить/LRW
нагладить/LRW
нагромоздить/BLRW
надкусить/BLRW
надстроить/LRW
назализовать/LQW
накипятить/LRW
накрасить/LRTW
накупить/BLRW
наловчиться/BLRW
наметить/LRTW
намочиться/LRW
наноситься/LPW
напоить/BLRW
направиться/LRTW
напуститься/BLRW
нарушить/LRTW
насладиться/BLRW
настроить/LRTW
натащить/BLRW
нахамить/BLRW
нахулиганить/LRW
нашарить/LRTW
недоучить/LRW
носиться/BLPW
обанкротиться/LRW
обводнить/LRW
обезвредить/LRTW
обезножить/LRW
обескрылить/LRW
обессолить/LRW
обзаводиться/BLPW
облагородить/LRTW
облегчиться/BLRW
облучить/BLRW
обморозить/LRW
обновить/BLRW
ободрить/BLRW
оборониться/LRW
обрамить/LRW
обручиться/BLRW
обслюнить/LRW
обсушить/BLRW
обхватить/BLRW
объединить/BLRW
огладить/LRW
огородиться/BLRW
ограничить/LRTW
одомашнить/LRW
оживить/BLRW
озариться/LRW
ознакомить/LRTW
оклеить/LRTW
окрасить/LRTW
окрутить/BLRW
омолодить/BLRW
опечалить/LRTW
опозорить/LRTW
опорожниться/BLRW
опредметить/LRW
опушить/LRW
осветить/BLRW
осердиться/LRW
оскопить/LRW
осмелиться/LRTW
оставить/LRTW
острословить/LPW
отбавить/LRW
отбродить/LRW
отвалиться/BLRW
отворить/BLRW
отгрузить/BLRW
отдубасить/LRTW
отколошматить/LRW
открепиться/BLRW
отладить/LRTW
отлудить/LRW
отметиться/LRTW
отобразить/BLRW
отплатить/BLRW
отравиться/BLRW
отрубиться/LRW
отслонить/LRW
отстрелить/BLRW
оттенить/BLRW
отучиться/BLRW
отчислить/BLRW
отъединить/LRW
охладить/BLRW
очернить/BLRW
ошкурить/LRW
палить/BLPW
перебеситься/BLRW
перебудить/BLRW
переводить/BLPW
перевооружиться/LRW
перегладить/LRTW
передоверить/LRTW
перезагрузить/BLRW
перезвонить/BLRW
перекатиться/BLRW
перекорёжить/LRW
перекреститься/BLRW
переловить/BLRW
перемениться/BLRW
переморозиться/LRW
переоблучить/LRW
переохладиться/BLRW
переполошить/LRW
переродиться/BLRW
пересластить/LRW
перестроить/LRTW
перетрусить/LRTW
переучить/LRW
перечинить/LRW
пижонить/LPTW
плодоносить/BLPW
побеспокоиться/LRTW
повалить/BLRW
повеситься/LRTW
повредить/BLRW
повыстроить/LRW
поголосить/LRW
погрустить/LRW
подбодриться/BLRW
подгадить/LRTW
поджарить/LRTW
подзубрить/BLRW
подклеить/LRTW
подкраситься/LRTW
подлечить/BLRW
подмаслить/LRW
поднатужиться/LRTW
подпортить/LRW
подрулить/LRW
подселить/BLRW
подсолить/BLRW
подступиться/BLRW
подурачиться/LRTW
подцепиться/LRW
подымить/LRW
пожурить/BLRW
позлатить/LRW
позориться/LPTW
покатиться/BLRW
покорежить/LRW
покоробить/LRW
покрошить/BLRW
покутить/BLRW
полечиться/BLRW
получить/BLRW
помедлить/BLRW
помириться/BLRW
помочить/BLRW
помыслить/BLRW
понежиться/LRTW
поострить/BLRW
пополнить/BLRW
попудриться/LRW
поранить/LRTW
портить/BLPTW
посветить/BLRW
посетить/BLRW
послюнявить/LRTW
поссориться/LRTW
поступить/BLRW
потащить/BLRW
потопить/BLRW
потребить/LRW
потушить/BLRW
похвалиться/BLRW
почистить/BLRW
пощадить/BLRW
превратиться/BLRW
предопределить/LRW
представить/LRTW
преклониться/BLRW
препроводить/BLRW
прибавиться/LRW
привалить/BLRW
приводиться/LPW
пригладить/LRTW
приготовить/LRTW
прижмурить/LRTW
приключиться/LRW
прикрутить/BLRW
приловчиться/BLRW
примерить/LRTW
примоститься/BLRW
принизить/LRTW
приобщить/BLRW
приохотиться/LRW
припудриться/LRW
присвоить/LRTW
присовокупить/BLRW
приспустить/BLRW
приступить/BLRW
притвориться/BLRW
притушить/BLRW
приурочить/LRTW
прицениться/BLRW
пришпандорить/LRW
приютить/BLRW
пробросить/LRW
провалиться/BLRW
проводить/BLPRW
провялить/LRTW
прогостить/LRW
продымить/LRW
производиться/BLPW
прокемарить/LRW
прокрасить/LRTW
пролечиться/LRW
промурыжить/LRW
пропилить/BLRW
прорубить/BLRW
просигналить/LRTW
прослезиться/BLRW
проставить/LRTW
просушить/BLRW
противоположить/LRW
протравить/BLRW
прохладиться/LRW
прошляпить/LRTW
пустить/BLRW
пылиться/LPW
разбеситься/LRW
развеселить/BLRW
развозиться/LPW
разговорить/BLRW
разгрузиться/BLRW
раздразнить/BLRW
раззнакомиться/LRTW
разломить/BLRW
размозжить/LRW
разниться/BLPW
разонравиться/LW
разрешиться/BLRW
разубедить/BLRW
разъединить/BLRW
раскалиться/BLRW
расклешить/LRW
раскрасить/LRTW
раскулачить/LRW
распалить/LRW
расплодить/LRW
распределиться/BLRW
распушить/BLRW
расслабить/LRTW
рассредоточить/LRTW
растащить/BLRW
растопырить/LRTW
растревожить/LRTW
расхвалить/LRW
расцепиться/LRW
расшалиться/LRW
ребячиться/LPTW
рубить/BLPW
рушить/LPTW
самоопределиться/LRW
сблизить/LRTW
свалиться/BLRW
свершить/BLRW
сводиться/BLPW
сговориться/BLRW
сгустить/BLRW
семенить/BLPW
сигналить/LPTW
сквасить/LRTW
скользить/BLPW
скосить/BLRW
скривиться/BLRW
славиться/LPTW
словчить/LRW
слупить/BLRW
смастачить/LRW
сместиться/BLRW
смориться/LRW
смыслить/BLPW
снизиться/LRTW
соблазниться/BLRW
соединить/BLRW
сообщить/BLRW
соскучиться/LRTW
состроить/LRTW
спешить/BLPW
спорить/LPTW
спружиниться/LRTW
сразиться/BLRW
ссориться/LPTW
старить/LPTW
столбить/LPW
страшиться/BLPW
струсить/LRTW
судить/BLPW
сутулиться/LPTW
схитрить/BLRW
счетверить/LRW
таить/BLPW
таращиться/BLPW
теребить/BLPW
топить/BLPW
торопиться/BLPW
тревожить/LPTW
трудоустроиться/LRW
тушить/BLPW
убедиться/BLRW
увериться/LRTW
увозить/BLPW
угодить/BLRW
удавиться/BLRW
удешевить/LRW
удорожить/LRW
удручить/LRW
ужесточить/LRW
укорить/LRW
укрупнить/BLRW
улетучиться/LRTW
умаслить/LRW
уместиться/BLRW
умудрить/LW
уносить/BLPW
упокоить/LW
упросить/BLRW
урезонить/LRTW
усилиться/LRW
усмирить/BLRW
уставиться/LRTW
устремиться/BLRW
усыпить/BLRW
утешить/LRTW
утопить/BLRW
уходить/BLPW
учить/BLPW
фабрить/LPW
фуфыриться/LPW
херить/LPW
хоронить/BLPW
царить/BLPW
чалить/LPW
чистить/BLPW
шарить/LPTW
шоферить/LPW
щерить/BLPW
явить/BLRW
